Georgia, session 2025_26, HB649.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 649
- 1 -

25 LC 46 1159
15 SECTION 1.
16 The General Assembly finds that:
17 (1) Georgia has prioritized advancements in access to mental health care and addressing
18 issues of maternal health and maternal mortality;
19 (2) The largest demographic of Americans grappling with depression is women of
20 childbearing age. The mental well-being of women before, during, and after giving birth
21 is a matter of significant concern for women, their families, their communities, and their
22 healthcare providers. This issue is of particular interest to the General Assembly in that it
23 has far-reaching impact on the public health and the welfare of people in this state;
24 (3) Maternal mental health conditions are among the most common complications of
25 pregnancy and childbirth;
26 (4) Statistics from experts in the field show that one in five perinatal women will
27 experience mood and anxiety disorders at some time during the period spanning from
28 pregnancy through 12 months after the birth of a child;
29 (5) Maternal depression, anxiety, and other mood disorders can be debilitating conditions,
30 but they are treatable if properly diagnosed;
31 (6) Early identification and treatment of maternal mental health conditions significantly
32 improves outcomes for mothers and children;
33 (7) Children born to mothers with untreated depression face a higher likelihood of
34 encountering developmental challenges and increased utilization of medical and mental
35 health services throughout their lives;
36 (8) It is imperative, then, in order to protect and promote public health and welfare, to
37 ensure the prompt diagnosis and treatment of women experiencing postpartum depression
38 or other maternal mental health disorders;
39 (9) The American Medical Association, the American College of Obstetrics and
40 Gynecology, the American College of Nurse Midwives, and the American Academy of
H. B. 649
- 2 -

25 LC 46 1159
41 Pediatrics recommend perinatal mental health screenings at certain intervals for all
42 pregnant and postpartum women;
43 (10) Universal maternal mental health screening questionnaires test for the presence of
44 prenatal or postpartum mood disorders through validated, evidence based tools;
45 (11) These screening questionnaires are available at little to no cost;
46 (12) In order to preserve and promote maternal health and strong families, it is imperative
47 that the State of Georgia provide access to periodic mental health screening questionnaires
48 for women throughout and after their pregnancies; and
49 (13) There is a critical need to ensure equitable access to maternal mental health screening
50 and care across Georgia, particularly in rural and other underserved communities.
51 SECTION 2.
52 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Maternal Mental Health
53 Improvement Act."
54 SECTION 3.
55 Chapter 1 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
56 provisions relative to insurance, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
57 "33-1-28.
58 (a) As used in this Code section, the term:
59 (1) 'Maternal mental health screening' means the use of an independent, evidence based
60 screening instrument that is generally recognized by mental healthcare providers for
61 identifying maternal mental health conditions, including without limitation screening
62 instruments issued or recommended by nonprofit healthcare provider professional
63 associations and specialty societies.
64 (2) 'Medically necessary' has the same meaning as in Code Section 33-1-27.
H. B. 649
- 3 -

25 LC 46 1159
65 (3) 'Mental healthcare provider' means any person licensed under Title 43 to provide
66 prenatal, labor and delivery, or postpartum care, including without limitation physicians,
67 psychiatrists, psychologists, advanced practice registered nurses, physician assistants,
68 licensed clinical social workers, and licensed professional counselors and marriage and
69 family therapists.
70 (4) 'Telehealth services' means services provided via two-way, real-time interactive
71 communication between a patient and a mental healthcare provider at a distant site
72 through telecommunications equipment, which services are compliant with federal Health
73 Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) privacy, security, and
74 breach notification rules.
75 (b) Each health benefit policy issued, delivered, or renewed in this state shall provide
76 coverage for:
77 (1) Maternal mental health screening during the prenatal period and 12 months
78 postpartum; and
79 (2) Care and treatment for those screenings positive for maternal mental health
80 conditions.
81 (c) The coverage provided in subsection (b) of this Code section shall include the
82 following:
83 (1) Initial screening during the first prenatal visit;
84 (2) Follow-up screening during the second or third trimester;
85 (3) Screening during the six-week postpartum visit;
86 (4) Additional screenings at three, six, and 12 months postpartum; and
87 (5) Additional screenings as deemed medically necessary by a mental healthcare
88 provider.
89 (d) All of the services provided in this Code section shall be covered whether provided in
90 person or through telehealth services.
H. B. 649
- 4 -

25 LC 46 1159
91 (e) To implement the provisions of this Code section, the department shall, when
92 necessary, submit a Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver request to the United States
93 Department of Health and Human Services.
94 (f) The provisions of this Code section shall apply to all policies, contracts, and certificates
95 executed, delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or after
96 January 1, 2026."
97 SECTION 4.
98 Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
99 medical assistance generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
100 "49-4-159.5.
101 (a) Except in cases where the woman refuses the maternal mental health screening, a
102 pregnant or postpartum woman seeking healthcare from a physician or other healthcare
103 provider shall be screened for perinatal mood and anxiety disorders, as determined
104 necessary:
105 (1) At the pregnant woman's first prenatal visit;
106 (2) When the pregnant woman is between 28 to 32 weeks' gestation;
107 (3) Between delivery and discharge from the facility where the pregnant woman gives
108 birth;
109 (4) At the woman's six-week postpartum obstetrical visit;
110 (5) If there is a pregnancy loss and at the follow-up obstetric visit after such loss; and
111 (6) At a pediatric visit occurring when the infant is three months of age or, if there is no
112 such visit, at the postpartum woman's healthcare visit any time from three months to one
113 year after pregnancy loss or delivery.
114 (b) The right to refuse the mental health screening described in subsection (a) of this Code
115 section shall not exist for a patient determined by the physician or other healthcare provider
116 to be mentally incompetent.
H. B. 649
- 5 -

25 LC 46 1159
117 (c)(1) The maternal mental health screening provided for in subsection (a) of this Code
118 section shall be conducted by the physician or other healthcare provider who is providing
119 prenatal, obstetric, or postpartum care of the pregnant woman or pediatric care of the
120 woman's infant, as deemed necessary by such physician or healthcare provider. Each
121 such screening shall utilize questionnaires that conform with nationally recognized
122 clinical practice guidelines and shall be used for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment,
123 appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of a woman's mental health, well-being,
124 disease, or condition as supported by medical and scientific evidence.
125 (2) Additional maternal mental health screenings, which may be refused, may be
126 conducted at any other point during the pregnancy or the postpartum period as deemed
127 necessary by the physician or other healthcare provider. Appropriate referral information
128 and resources addressing perinatal mood or anxiety disorders shall be provided during
129 such screenings.
130 (d) A physician or other healthcare provider who provides obstetric or pediatric care shall
131 provide educational materials through electronic or other means on the signs and symptoms
132 of perinatal mood and anxiety disorders to pregnant and postpartum women under his or
133 her care, or to mothers of children under his or her care, as deemed necessary by such
134 physician or healthcare provider.
135 (e) This Code section shall not preclude any other healthcare provider acting within his or
136 her scope of practice from screening for maternal mental health conditions or from
137 providing referral information and resources or educational materials on perinatal mood
138 and anxiety disorders.
139 (f) The department shall establish a comprehensive quality metrics program that includes
140 the following:
141 (1) Process measures, including but not limited to:
142 (A) Percentage of eligible patients screened at each required interval;
143 (B) Time from positive screen to first behavioral health contact;
H. B. 649
- 6 -

25 LC 46 1159
144 (C) Completion rates for referrals to behavioral health services; and
145 (D) Utilization rates of telehealth services;
146 (2) Outcome measures, including but not limited to:
147 (A) Rates of postpartum depression and anxiety identification;
148 (B) Emergency department utilization for mental health concerns;
149 (C) Psychiatric hospitalization rates; and
150 (D) Duration of treatment engagement;
151 (3) Equity measures, including but not limited to:
152 (A) Screening and treatment rates stratified by race, ethnicity, and geographic location;
153 and
154 (B) Disparities in access to care and outcomes; and
155 (4) Patient experience measures, including but not limited to:
156 (A) Satisfaction with screening process;
157 (B) Perceived barriers to care; and
158 (C) Experiences with telehealth services.
159 (g) The department shall establish a three-year pilot program for remote maternal mental
160 health screening and monitoring no later than January 1, 2026, that shall:
161 (1) Prioritize high-risk populations and rural communities;
162 (2) Include telehealth services;
163 (3) Integrate with existing maternal health programs including home visiting services;
164 and
165 (4) Collect data on program effectiveness and barriers to care.
166 (h) The department may allocate sufficient funds to support:
167 (1) Technology infrastructure and support;
168 (2) Provider training and technical assistance; and
169 (3) Program evaluation and reporting.
170 (i) The department shall:
H. B. 649
- 7 -

25 LC 46 1159
171 (1) Promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this chapter;
172 (2) Establish a process for monitoring compliance; and
173 (3) Report annually to the Senate Health and Human Services Committee and the House
174 Committees on Health and Public Health on the implementation progress and outcomes
175 of the requirements of this Code section.
176 (j) The annual report provided in subsection (i) of this Code section shall be required from
177 July 1, 2026, through July 1, 2028.
178 (k) The department shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the purpose
179 of administering the requirements under this Code section."
180 SECTION 5.
181 This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026, only if prior to such date, funds are
182 specifically appropriated for the purposes of this Act in an appropriations Act making
183 specific reference to this Act.
184 SECTION 6.
185 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 649
- 8 -